Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 3. Conditions Leading to Presumption of Aban-
donment of Particular Types of Personal Property.

Editor’s notes. —

With respect to the 2004 amendments made to sections within this article, under sec. 19, ch. 90, SLA 2004, the changes made by that 2004 Act apply to property that, on June 26, 2004, already was subject to a statutory provision amended by the Act or that, on or after June 26, 2004, becomes subject to a statutory provision amended by the Act.
See § 19, ch. 90, SLA 2004, in the 2004 Temporary and Special Acts.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 90, SLA 2004 (SB 231), amending sections within this article, see 2003 Senate Journal 1721 - 1722.

Sec. 34.45.140.
Traveler’s checks and money orders.

Subject to (d) of this section, money payable on a traveler’s check that has been outstanding for more than 15 years after its issuance is presumed abandoned unless the owner, within the preceding 15 years, has communicated in writing with the issuer concerning it or otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record, on file, prepared by an employee of the issuer.

Subject to (d) of this section, money payable on a money order or similar written instrument, other than a third-party bank check, that has been outstanding for more than seven years after its issuance is presumed abandoned unless the owner, within the preceding seven years, has communicated in writing with the issuer concerning it or otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record, on file, prepared by an employee of the issuer.

A holder may not deduct from the amount of a traveler’s check or money order a charge imposed for failure to present the instrument for payment unless there is a valid and enforceable written contract between the issuer and the owner of the instrument under which the issuer may impose a charge, and the issuer regularly imposes charges and does not regularly reverse or otherwise cancel them.

Money payable on a traveler’s check, money order, or similar written instrument, other than a third-party check, described in (a) and (b) of this section, is not subject to the custody of the state as unclaimed property unless

the records of the issuer show that the traveler’s check, money order, or similar written instrument was purchased in the state;

the issuer has its principal place of business in the state and the records of the issuer do not show the state in which the traveler’s check, money order, or similar written instrument was purchased; or

the issuer has its principal place of business in the state, the records of the issuer show the state in which the traveler’s check, money order, or similar written instrument was purchased and the state of purchase either does not provide by law for the escheat or custodial taking of the property or its escheat or unclaimed property law is not applicable to the property.

Notwithstanding any other provision of AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

, (d) of this section applies to money payable on traveler’s checks, money orders, and similar written instruments, other than a third-party bank check, presumed abandoned after January 31, 1965, except to the extent that those sums have been paid over to a state before January 1, 1974.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986)

Sec. 34.45.150.
Checks, drafts, and similar instruments issued or certified by banking and financial organizations.

Other than money payable on an instrument that is subject to AS

34.45.140

, money payable on a check, draft, or similar instrument on which a banking or financial organization is directly liable, including a cashier’s check and a certified check, that has been outstanding for more than five years after it was payable or after its issuance if payable on demand, is presumed abandoned. This presumption does not apply if the owner, within the preceding five years, has communicated in writing with the banking or financial organization concerning the instrument or has otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record, on file, prepared by an employee of the organization.

A holder may not deduct from the amount of an instrument subject to this section a charge imposed for failure to present the instrument for payment unless there is a valid and enforceable written contract between the holder and the owner of the instrument under which the holder may impose a charge, and the holder regularly imposes the charges and does not regularly reverse or otherwise cancel them.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986; am § 2 ch 90 SLA 2004)

Sec. 34.45.160.
Bank deposits and money in financial organizations.

A demand, savings, or matured time deposit with a banking or financial organization, including a deposit that is automatically renewable, and money paid toward the purchase of a share, a mutual investment certificate, or other intangible property interest in a banking or financial organization is presumed abandoned unless the owner, within the preceding five years, has

in the case of a deposit, increased or decreased its amount or presented the passbook or other similar evidence of the deposit for the crediting of interest;

communicated in writing with the banking or financial organization concerning the property; or

otherwise indicated an interest in the property as evidenced by a memorandum or other record, on file, prepared by an employee of the banking or financial organization.

A holder may not impose, with respect to property described in (a) of this section, a charge due to dormancy or inactivity, or cease payment of interest.

Property described in (a) of this section that is automatically renewable is matured for purposes of (a) of this section upon the expiration of its initial time period. However, in the case of a renewal to which the owner consents at or about the time of renewal by communicating in writing with the banking or financial organization or by otherwise indicating consent as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file, prepared by an employee of the organization, the property is matured upon the expiration of the last time period for which consent was given. If, at the time provided for delivery in AS

34.45.320

, a penalty or forfeiture in the payment of interest would result from the delivery of the property, the time for delivery is extended until the time when no penalty or forfeiture would result.

For purposes of this section, “property” includes interest and dividends.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986; am § 3 ch 90 SLA 2004)

Sec. 34.45.170.
Money owing under life insurance policies.

Money held or owing under a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract that has matured or terminated is presumed abandoned if unclaimed for more than three years after the money became due and payable as established from the records of the insurance company holding or owing the money.

If a person other than the insured or annuitant is entitled to the money and the address of that person is not known to the company, or it is not definite and certain from the records of the company who is entitled to the money, it is presumed that the last known address of the person entitled to the money is the same as the last known address of the insured or annuitant according to the records of the company.

For purposes of this section, a life endowment insurance policy or annuity contract not matured by actual proof of the death of the insured or annuitant according to the records of the company is matured and the proceeds are due and payable if

the company has received due proof that the insured or annuitant has died; or

the insured has attained, or would have attained if still living, the limiting age under the mortality table on which the reserve is based and

the policy was in force at the time the insured attained, or would have attained, the limiting age; and

neither the insured nor another person appearing to have an interest in the policy has, within the preceding two years, according to the records of the company, assigned, readjusted, or paid premiums on the policy, subjected the policy to a loan, corresponded in writing with the company concerning the policy, or otherwise indicated an interest as evidence by a memorandum or other record, on file, prepared by an employee of the company.

For purposes of this section, the application of an automatic premium loan provision or other nonforfeiture provision contained in an insurance policy does not prevent a policy from being matured or terminated under (a) of this section if the insured has died or the insured or the beneficiary of the policy otherwise has become entitled to the proceeds of the policy before the depletion of the cash surrender value of a policy by the application of those nonforfeiture provisions.

If the laws of the state or the terms of the life insurance policy require the company to give notice to the insured or the owner that an automatic premium loan provision or other nonforfeiture provision has been exercised and the notice is to be given to an insured or owner whose last known address, according to the records of the company, is in the state but is undeliverable, the company shall make a reasonable search to ascertain the policyholder’s correct address to which the notice must be mailed.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the company learns of the death of the insured or annuitant and the beneficiary has not communicated with the insurer within four months after the death, the company shall take reasonable steps to pay the proceeds to the beneficiary.

Commencing September 8, 1988, every change-of-beneficiary form issued by an insurance company under a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract to an insured or owner who is a resident of the state must request the following information:

the name of each beneficiary, or if a class of beneficiaries is named, the name of each current beneficiary in the class;

the address of each beneficiary; and

the relationship of each beneficiary to the insured.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986; am § 4 ch 90 SLA 2004)

Sec. 34.45.175.
Certain property distributed in insurance company reorganizations.

The following property distributable in the course of a demutualization or related reorganization of an insurance company is considered abandoned two years after the date of demutualization or reorganization as follows:

money that remains unclaimed and the owner has not otherwise communicated with the holder or its agent regarding the property as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file with the holder or its agent;

stock or other equity interest if

the instruments or statements reflecting the distribution are either mailed to the owner and returned by the post office as undeliverable, or not mailed to the owner because of an address on the books and records of the holder that is known to be incorrect; and

the owner has not otherwise communicated with the holder or its agent regarding the property as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file with the holder or agent.

Property that is not subject to (a) of this section is reportable as otherwise provided in AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 90 SLA 2004)

Sec. 34.45.180.
Deposits held by utilities.

A deposit, including interest on the deposit, made by a subscriber with a utility to secure payment, or money paid in advance for utility services to be furnished, less lawful deductions, that remains unclaimed by the owner for more than one year after the termination of the services for which the deposit or advance payment was made is presumed abandoned.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986)

Opinions of attorney general. —

While AS

34.45.190

may be reasonably construed to give the Commission authority to prescribe a longer period before a refund is “presumed abandoned,” it cannot be interpreted to grant the Commission authority over the disposition of the abandoned deposits and refunds. These are to be reported to and delivered to the Department which has the responsibility for attempting to locate the missing owners. To construe the statute otherwise would grant a windfall to the utilities and their present customers, to the detriment of the owners of the property. June 1, 1987, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 34.45.190.
Refunds held by business associations.

Except to the extent otherwise ordered by a court or administrative agency, money that a business association has been ordered by the court or administrative agency to refund is presumed abandoned if it remains unclaimed by the owner for more than one year after it became payable in accordance with the final determination or order providing for the refund, regardless of whether the final determination or order requires the owner to make a claim for it.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986)

Sec. 34.45.200.
Stock and other intangible interests in business associations.

Stock or other equity interest in a business association is presumed abandoned five years after the earliest of the date

of the most recent dividend, stock split, or other distribution unclaimed by the owner;

that a statement of account or other notification or communication concerning the stock or other equity interest was returned as undeliverable; or

that the holder of the stock or other equity interest discontinued mailings, notifications, or communications to the owner.

Unmatured or unredeemed debt of a business association, other than a bearer bond or an original issue discount bond, is presumed abandoned five years after the date of the most recent interest payment unclaimed by the owner.

Matured or redeemed debt, including bearer bonds and original issue discount bonds, is presumed abandoned five years after the date of maturity or redemption.

At the time property is presumed abandoned under this section, any other property right accrued or accruing to the owner as a result of the property interest and not previously presumed abandoned is also presumed abandoned.

A distribution of net margins by a cooperative incorporated under AS 10.25 is presumed abandoned if the distribution remains unclaimed by the owner for more than one year after the date authorized for the distribution. The distribution presumed abandoned under this subsection reverts to the cooperative if the cooperative has, at least six months before the proposed date that the distribution reverts to the cooperative, mailed a notice of the proposed reversion to the last known address of the owner as shown on the cooperative records and

if the cooperative does not have an Internet website, published notice of the proposed reversion in the manner provided by law or court rule for service of a summons by publication; or

if the cooperative has an Internet website,

posted for at least 180 days on the cooperative’s Internet website

a list of the persons for whom the cooperative has unclaimed distributions; and

a notice of the proposed reversion that prominently displays a notice line and that provides a link to the list identified in (i) of this subparagraph; the notice must appear on the home page of the cooperative’s Internet website; and

published once a week for four consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the judicial district where the cooperative is located a notice of the proposed reversion that provides the address of the cooperative’s Internet website and indicates that the list identified in (A)(i) of this paragraph can be found at that address; the notice shall be published simultaneously

in the print version of the newspaper in a display advertisement; the display advertisement must be at least 18 square inches in area and must prominently display the notice line at the top; and

on the Internet version of the newspaper, if an Internet version of the newspaper exists.

In (e) of this section,

“newspaper of general circulation” has the meaning given in AS

09.35.140

;

“notice line” means the words “do we owe you money? unclaimed (name of cooperative) capital credits” in capital letters.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 145 SLA 1996; am § 6 ch 90 SLA 2004; am §§ 1, 2 ch 43 SLA 2008)

Sec. 34.45.210.
Property of business associations held in course of dissolution.

Intangible property distributable in the course of a dissolution of a business association that remains unclaimed by the owner for more than one year after the date specified for final distribution is presumed abandoned.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986; am § 99 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Sec. 34.45.220.
Property held by agents and fiduciaries.

Intangible property and income or increment derived from the intangible property held in a fiduciary capacity for the benefit of another person is presumed abandoned unless the owner, within three years after it has become payable or distributable, has increased or decreased the principal, accepted payment of principal or income, communicated concerning the property, or otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record, on file, prepared by the fiduciary.

Money in an individual retirement account or a retirement plan for self-employed individuals or similar account or plan established under the internal revenue laws of the United States is not payable or distributable within the meaning of (a) of this section unless, under the terms of the account or plan, distribution of all or part of the funds would then be mandatory.

For the purpose of this section, a person who holds property as an agent for a business association is considered as holding the property in a fiduciary capacity for that business association alone, unless the agreement between that person and the business association provides otherwise.

For the purposes of this chapter, a person who is considered as holding property in a fiduciary capacity for a business association alone is the holder of the property only so far as the interest of the business association in the property is concerned, and the business association is the holder of the property so far as the interest of another person in the property is concerned.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986; am § 7 ch 90 SLA 2004)

Sec. 34.45.230.
Property held by courts and public agencies.

Except as provided by AS

34.45.720(d)

, intangible property held for the owner by a court, state, municipality, or other government, governmental subdivision, or agency, public corporation, or public authority, that remains unclaimed by the owner for more than one year after becoming payable or distributable, is presumed abandoned.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986; am § 9 ch 129 SLA 1996)

Sec. 34.45.240.
Gift certificates and credit memos.

A gift certificate or a credit memo, issued in the ordinary course of an issuer’s business, that remains unclaimed by the owner for more than three years after becoming payable or distributable is presumed abandoned.

In the case of a gift certificate, the amount presumed abandoned is the price paid by the purchaser for the gift certificate. In the case of a credit memo, the amount presumed abandoned is the amount credited to the recipient of the memo.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986; am § 8 ch 90 SLA 2004)

Sec. 34.45.250.
Wages.

Unpaid wages, including wages represented by unpresented payroll checks, owing in the ordinary course of the holder’s business and that remain unclaimed by the owner for more than one year after becoming payable are presumed abandoned.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986)

Sec. 34.45.260.
Contents of safe deposit box or other safekeeping repository.

All tangible and intangible personal property held in a safe deposit box or other safekeeping repository in a financial organization in the state in the ordinary course of the holder’s business, and proceeds resulting from the sale of the property permitted by other law, that remain unclaimed by the owner for more than one year after the lease or rental period on the box or other repository has expired, are presumed abandoned.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986)

Sec. 34.45.270.
Burden of proof as to property evidenced by record of check, draft, or similar instrument.

A record of the issuance of a check, draft, or similar instrument is prima facie evidence of an obligation.
In claiming property from a holder who is also the issuer, the department’s burden of proof as to the existence and amount of the property and its abandonment is satisfied by showing issuance of the instrument and passage of the requisite period of abandonment.
Defenses of payment, satisfaction, discharge, and want of consideration are affirmative defenses that must be established by the holder.

History.

(§ 9 ch 90 SLA 2004)